incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
    <pardef n="C/U__v">
      <e><p><l>Ukara</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UnA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Une</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UnI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UnIM</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UwA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Uwe</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UwI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UwIM</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ue</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uye</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uIM</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyIM</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uUz</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uye</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ue</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiye</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uie</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uye</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ue</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyeM</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uez</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uo</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiye</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uie</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyeM</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uez</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uUzgA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiyegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uezge</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyeMge</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uoge</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiyegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uezge</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyeMge</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uUzgI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uegI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyegI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiyegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uegI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyegI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uezgI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyeMgI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uogI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uiyegA</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uezgI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyeMgI</l><r>U<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UzgA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eMge</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oge</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eMge</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="cU"><i>c</i><par n="C/U__v"/></e>
    <e lm="CU"><i>C</i><par n="C/U__v"/></e>
